Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.020

Plan for nonhigh district to provide capital funds in aid of high school district.

Upon receipt of a written request from the board of directors of a high school district or a nonhigh school district that presents to the regional committee on school district organization satisfactory evidence of a need for high school facilities to be located therein and of ability to provide such facilities, the regional committee shall prepare a plan for participation by any nonhigh school district or districts in providing capital funds to pay the costs of such school facilities and equipment to be provided for the education of students residing in the school districts. Prior to submission of the aforesaid request the board of directors of the school district concerned therewith shall determine the nature and extent of the high school facilities proposed to be provided, the approximate amount of local capital funds required to pay the cost thereof, and the site or sites upon which the proposed facilities are to be located, and shall submit a report thereon to the regional committee along with the aforesaid request.

[ 1985 c 385 s 32; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.010. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 1; 1955 c 344 s 1; 1953 c 229 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.56.010, 28.56.010.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.